public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.dic
acèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
aparcèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ascèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
decèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inkoncèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intracèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
koncèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
mancèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ocèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
recèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
soscèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
tracèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
céñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
acéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
aparcéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ascéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
decéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inkoncéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intracéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
koncéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
mancéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
océñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
recéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
soscéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
tracéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
déver/mE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
deverò/mJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:déver
devo/mJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:déver
dévar/mE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
devarò/mJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:dévar
díxer/cnE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dixerò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:díxer
dixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:díxer
dixarò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:díxer
benedíxer/cnE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
benedixerò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:benedíxer
benedixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:benedíxer
benedixarò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:benedíxer
dexdíxer/cnE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dexdixerò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:dexdíxer
dexdixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:dexdíxer
dexdixarò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:dexdíxer
dixdíxer/cnE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dixdixerò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:dixdíxer
dixdixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:dixdíxer
dixdixarò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:dixdíxer
indíxer/cnE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
indixerò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:indíxer
indixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:indíxer
indixarò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:indíxer
interdíxer/cnE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
interdixerò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:interdíxer
interdixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:interdíxer
intardixarò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:interdíxer
intardixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:intardíxer
kontradíxer/cnE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
kontradixerò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:kontradíxer
kontradixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:kontradíxer
kontradixarò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:kontradíxer
maledíxer/cnE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
maledixerò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:maledíxer
maledixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:maledíxer
maƚedíxer/cnE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
maƚedixerò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:maƚedíxer
maƚedixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:maƚedíxer
maƚedixarò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:maƚedíxer
predíxer/cnE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
predixerò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:predíxer
predixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:predíxer
predixarò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:predíxer
redíxer/cnE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
redixerò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:redíxer
redixo/cnJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:redíxer
redixarò/cnJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:redíxer
tèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
apartèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
detèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
kontèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
otèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sostèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
téñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
apartéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
detéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intratéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
mantéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
retéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
tratéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
vèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
arvèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dexvèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intervèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intravèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
kontravèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
parvèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
resovèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
skonvèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
soravèñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
avéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dexvéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intervéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intravéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
kontravéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
parvéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
resovéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
skonvéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
soravéñer/clE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
